Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1144
Children with disabilities; education; funds; channeled through office of State Department of Education; expenditures authorized.

Funds shall be appropriated by the Legislature to carry out sections 79-1142 to 79-1144 and 79-1147. Such funds shall be channeled through the State Department of Education. The department is authorized to expend such funds upon proper vouchers approved by the department and warrants issued by the Director of Administrative Services for financial reimbursement to school districts, educational service units, special education cooperatives created by school districts, agencies, and parents or guardians, including (1) reimbursement pursuant to section 79-1129 for actual transportation expenses per year for children with disabilities a pro rata amount which shall be determined by the State Board of Education from appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature based on all actual allowable transportation costs, (2) reimbursement for instructional aids and consultative, supervisory, research, and testing services to school districts, and (3) reimbursement for salaries, wages, maintenance, supplies, travel, and other expenses essential to carrying out the provisions for special education programs. Minor building modifications shall not be eligible for state reimbursement as an allowable expense. Applications for state reimbursement for actual transportation expenses shall be submitted to the department annually on a date and on forms prescribed by the department. Amendments to applications for actual transportation expenses shall be submitted on dates prescribed by the department during the school year in which the original application was made.

Laws 1949, c. 131, § 8, p. 345;

Laws 1963, c. 256, § 1, p. 777;

Laws 1967, c. 526, § 4, p. 1749;

Laws 1971, LB 178, § 1;

Laws 1971, LB 977, § 2;

Laws 1972, LB 690, § 5;

Laws 1973, LB 102, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 92, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 1093, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 942, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 20;

R.S.Supp.,1986, § 43-611;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 33;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 15, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 597, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 858, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 742, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-3333;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 826;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 32;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 44.